Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-503
Cylinders; valves; requirements.

While in transit, in storage, and being moved into final utilization, all cylinders containing liquefied petroleum gas must have their valves protected as required by the regulations of the United States Department of Transportation on September 1, 2001.

Laws 1951, c. 188, § 3, p. 696;

Laws 2001, LB 137, § 3.